New Jersey, session 221, A487.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Transportation, in consultation with the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, shall conduct a study on the use of rock salt on roadways in this State and shall prepare and submit a written report, within one year of the effective date of this act, to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1)  information on the amount and cost of rock salt used by the Department of Transportation to clear snow and ice from roadways over the preceding 10 years; (2)  efforts that have been undertaken by the Department of Transportation to reduce the use of rock salt in clearing snow and ice from roadways over the preceding 10 years, including, but not limited to, information on whether the department utilizes road sensors to monitor pavement temperatures to ensure that rock salt is used at the appropriate time, in the appropriate place, and in an appropriate amount and whether, and to what extent, snow plows are equipped with tracking gear to collect information on weather, road conditions, and the amount of rock salt being used; (3)  how the use of rock salt on roadways has impacted the levels of sodium chloride in the States lakes, waterways, wells, and drinking water and how increased levels of sodium chloride impact aquatic life, fisheries, irrigation, recreation, and the quality of life of New Jersey residents; (4)  information on indirect costs associated with the use of rock salt by the Department of Transportation, including any costs incurred as a result of increased levels of sodium chloride in the States lakes, waterways, wells, and drinking water; (5)  information on alternatives to rock salt that have been utilized by the Department of Transportation to assist in clearing snow and ice from roadways; and (6)  an analysis of feasible alternatives to rock salt that could be utilized by the Department of Transportation in the future to assist in clearing snow and ice from roadways, including alternatives that may partially reduce or replace the use of rock salt in certain weather or geographical situations and including an analysis of the financial and environmental advantages and disadvantages of each feasible alternative. b.    In addition to the written report submitted pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the Commissioner of Transportation may submit a proposal for legislation that, in the opinion of the commissioner, improves the laws of this State regarding the use of rock salt to clear snow and ice from roadways. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the submission of the written report to the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to section 1 of this act.